Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-834
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Act:

(1) Certified community behavioral health clinic means a nonprofit organization, a unit of the local behavioral health authority, an entity operated under authority of the Indian Health Service, an Indian tribe, or tribal organization pursuant to a contract, grant, cooperative agreement, or compact with the Indian Health Service pursuant to the Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act of 1975, or an entity that is an urban Indian organization pursuant to a grant or contract with the Indian Health Service under Title V of the Indian Health Care Improvement Act, Public Law 94-437, providing community-based mental health and substance use health services that are nationally accredited that:

(a) Meet the federal certification criteria of the federal Protecting Access to Medicare Act of 2014 or a state certification system for certified community behavioral health clinics to be established by the department and which shall be substantially equivalent to the federal Protecting Access to Medicare Act of 2014; and

(b) Provide, at a minimum, the following community-based services either directly or indirectly through formal referral relationships with other providers:

(i) Outpatient mental health and substance use services;

(ii) Crisis mental health services;

(iii) Screening, assessment, and diagnosis, including risk assessments;

(iv) Person-centered treatment planning;

(v) Outpatient clinic primary care screening and monitoring of key health indicators and health risks;

(vi) Targeted case management;

(vii) Psychiatric rehabilitation services;

(viii) Peer support and counselor services and family supports; and

(ix) Community-based mental health care for members of the armed forces and veterans consistent with minimum clinical mental health guidelines promulgated by the Veterans Health Administration; and

(2) Prospective payment system means a daily or monthly medicaid payment methodology that allows providers to be reimbursed based on anticipated costs of providing required services to persons enrolled in medicaid.

Laws 2023, LB276, § 4.